Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.112.010

Disciplinary processes.

All institutions of higher education shall refrain from establishing a different disciplinary process on the same campus for a matter of sexual violence, based on the status or characteristics of the student involved in that disciplinary proceeding, including characteristics such as a student's membership on an athletic team, membership in a fraternity or sorority, academic year, or any other characteristics or status of a student.

[ 2015 c 92 s 2.]